Illinois, session 104th, SB2863.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Cook 5County Juvenile Temporary Detention Center Juvenile Justice 6Reentry Program Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative intent.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) a holistic, community-based reentry program for 10    young men released from the Cook County Juvenile Temporary 11    Detention Center is necessary to reduce recidivism by 12    strengthening aftercare services through family 13    reintegration, transitional housing, and economic 14    opportunity pipelines, grounded in restorative justice, 15    intergenerational mentorship, and youth empowerment; 16        (2) despite interventions, many young people released 17    from the Cook County Juvenile Temporary Detention Center 18    face recurring contact with the juvenile justice system 19    due to limited support upon reentry; and20        (3) key challenges include:21            (A) lack of coordinated support for families;22            (B) housing instability;23            (C) barriers to economic self-sufficiency; and  SB2863- 2 -LRB104 16291 RLC 29676 b1            (D) inadequate role models and near-peer 2        mentorship. 3    (b) To remedy these problems, it is the intent of the 4General Assembly to create the Cook County Juvenile Temporary 5Detention Center Juvenile Justice Reentry Program. The General 6Assembly recognizes that reducing recidivism begins with 7community involvement. Through holistic aftercare that centers 8on family, housing, and opportunity, this State can transform 9the pathways of justice-involved youth in Cook County.  10    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:11    "Program" means the Cook County Juvenile Temporary 12Detention Center Juvenile Justice Reentry Program.13    "Youth" means a person or persons released from the Cook 14County Juvenile Temporary Detention Center. 15    Section 15. Data partnership. There is created a data 16partnership among the Cook County Juvenile Temporary Detention 17Center, the Illinois State Police, the Illinois Criminal 18Justice Information Authority, the Administrative Office of 19the Illinois Courts, and the Department of Juvenile Justice to 20annually gather the following information on the population of 21youth served by the Cook County Juvenile Temporary Detention 22Center:23        (1) the total number of youth served during the 24    reporting period;  SB2863- 3 -LRB104 16291 RLC 29676 b1        (2) the recidivism rate among youth cited in paragraph 2    (1) within 6 and 12 months post-release;3        (3) the age range and gender breakdown of youth cited 4    in paragraph (1), with a focus on males between 13 and 20 5    years of age;6        (4) the demographic and geographic data (race, 7    ethnicity, and home zip codes) of youth cited in paragraph 8    (1); and 9        (5) the primary re-offense categories and conditions 10    of release for youth cited in paragraph (1). 11    Section 20. Family reintegration and home support. The 12Program shall equip families with the skills, resources, and 13mindset to support their child's reentry. The Program shall 14include:15        (1) social worker-led home readiness assessments; 16        (2) at-home care specialists assigned to each youth or 17    family for 90 to 180 days; and18        (3) trauma-informed parenting workshops and culturally 19    competent counseling. 20    Section 25. Transitional housing and mentorship. The 21Program shall provide youth with:22        (1) stable, affirming housing options and near-peer 23    support;24        (2) partnered transitional housing units   SB2863- 4 -LRB104 16291 RLC 29676 b1    (non-carceral); 2        (3) resident advisor mentors between 21 to 30 years of 3    age, with an emphasis on persons who were primarily 4    involved in the justice system; and5        (4) nightly check-ins, group circles, and restorative 6    justice practices. 7    Section 30. Economic opportunity. If agreed to by the 8partnership entity, the Program shall provide youth with:9        (1) self-sufficiency skill development and workforce 10    access;11        (2) career exploration workshops during detention at 12    the Cook County Juvenile Temporary Detention Center; and13        (3) post-release cohort-based upskilling programs in 3 14    tracks:15            (A) trade skills, construction training, and 16        education provided by organizations that provide 17        vocational training to youth;18            (B) entrepreneurship and business education by 19        organizations that provide business opportunities to 20        youth; and21            (C) civic internships and policy fellowships by 22        organizations and State and local officeholders and 23        organizations that mentor youth.24    Local churches, chief business officers, and service 25providers shall provide support for implementation of the   SB2863- 5 -LRB104 16291 RLC 29676 b1Program. 2    Section 35. Pilot phase of Program. The Program shall be 3voluntary and shall have the participation of 15 to 20 male 4youth between 14 to 18 years of age released from the Cook 5County Juvenile Temporary Detention Center within a 90-day 6period. 7    Section 40. Pilot phase timelines. The first quarter of 8operation of the Program shall consist of planning and 9recruitment. The second quarter of operation shall consist of 10the launch of the Program and securing housing units for the 11participants of the Program. The third and fourth quarters of 12the Program shall consist of evaluating, iterating, and 13scaling the Program. The Program evaluation shall measure: (i) 146th and 12 month recidivism rates of participants in the 15Program; (ii) completion rates of participants in the Program; 16and (iii) employment or internship placements. The Program 17shall provide participants with participant and family 18satisfaction surveys after their completion of the Program.  19    Section 45. Funding. Reentry and aftercare grant funding 20shall be provided by the Department of Human Services.